Connecticut, session 2026, HB05386.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 31-13a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [With] Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section,
with each wage payment each employer shall furnish to each employee,
in writing or, with the employee's explicit consent, electronically, a
record of hours worked, the gross earnings showing straight time and
overtime as separate entries, itemized deductions and net earnings,
except that the furnishing of a record of hours worked and the
separation of straight time and overtime earnings shall not apply in the
case of any employee with respect to whom the employer is specifically
exempt from the keeping of time records and the payment of overtime
under the Connecticut Minimum Wage Act or the Fair Labor Standards
Act.
(b) If the record of hours is furnished electronically pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the employer shall provide a means for
HB5386 / File No. 199 1

HB5386 File No. 199
each employee to securely, privately and conveniently access and print
such record. The employer shall incorporate reasonable safeguards
regarding any information contained in the record furnished
electronically pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to protect the
confidentiality of an employee's personal information.
(c) (1) For purposes of this subsection, "employer" means a person
engaged in any activity, enterprise or business who employs fifty or
more employees, including the state and any political subdivision
thereof.
(2) Each employer shall create a guide for pay codes for overtime and
any pay differentials, including, but not limited to, shift differentials,
on-call pay, hazard pay, call-back pay, holiday or weekend pay or
geographical pay differentials used by the employer in such records
furnished pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Each such guide
shall be posted on the employer's Internet web site in English, Spanish
and the other most common languages spoken by employees of the
employer and include contact information of the designated office or
individual who will handle employee disputes regarding calculations of
hours and pay differentials. An employer shall update such guide each
time a new pay code is used for overtime or any pay differentials is
added by the employer.
(3) An employer shall (A) provide the Internet web site address to
such guide required pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection to an
employee upon hire, and (B) include the Internet web site address to
such guide on each record of hours furnished to an employee pursuant
to subsection (a) of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-13a
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5386 / File No. 199 2

HB5386 File No. 199
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. GF - Potential See Below See Below
Revenue Gain
Note: GF=General Fund e
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires employers with at least 50 employees to
create a guide for pay codes used, results in a potential revenue gain to
the Department of Labor to the extent violations are found and penalties
are paid. Per CGS 31-69a, the penalty is $300 per each violation.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of violations and
penalties paid.
HB5386 / File No. 199 3

HB5386 File No. 199
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5386
AN ACT REQUIRING PAYCHECK TRANSPARENCY.